Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1060.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7011 of Title 36, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this act:


1. “Earned premium” means all monies paid by a policyholder or


subscriber as a condition of receiving coverage from the insurer,



Req. No. 367 Page 1


including any fees or other contributions associated with the dental


plan;


2. “Medical loss ratio” (MLR) means the minimum percentage of


all premium funds collected by an insurer each year that shall be


spent on actual patient care rather than overhead costs. The funds


to be spent on actual patient care under this subsection shall be


refunded to individuals and groups in the form of a rebate; and


3. “Unpaid claim reserves” means reserves and liabilities


established to account for claims that were incurred during the MLR


reporting year but were not paid within three (3) months of the end


of the MLR reporting year.


B. The medical loss ratio for a dental plan or the dental


coverage portion of a health benefit plan shall be determined by


dividing the numerator by the denominator as defined in this


section.


C. 1. The numerator shall be the amount spent on care. The


amount spent on care shall include:


a. the amount expended for clinical dental services,


which are services within the code on dental


procedures and nomenclature, provided to enrollees


which includes payments under capitation contracts


with dental providers, whose services are covered by


the contract for dental clinical services or supplies


covered by the contract; provided, any overpayment

Req. No. 367 Page 2


that has already been received from providers shall


not be reported as a paid claim. Overpayment


recoveries received from providers shall be deducted


from incurred claim amounts,


b. unpaid claim reserves, and


c. claim payments recovered by insurers from providers or


enrollees using utilization management efforts,


deducted from claim amounts.


2. Calculation of the numerator shall not include:


a. all administrative costs, including, but not limited


to, infrastructure, personnel costs, or broker


payments,


b. amounts paid to third-party vendors for secondary


network savings,


c. amounts paid to third-party vendors for network


development, administrative fees, claims processing,


and utilization management, and


d. amounts paid to a provider for professional or


administrative services that do not represent


compensation or reimbursement for covered services to


an enrollee, including, but not limited to, dental


record copying costs, attorney fees, subrogation


vendor fees, and compensation to paraprofessionals,


janitors, quality assurance analysts, administrative

Req. No. 367 Page 3


supervisors, secretaries to dental personnel, and


dental record clerks.


D. The denominator shall include the total amount of the earned


premium revenues, excluding federal and state taxes and licensing


and regulatory fees paid after accounting for any payments pursuant


to federal law.


E. 1. A dental benefit plan or the dental portion of a health


benefit plan that issues, sells, renews, or offers a specialized


health benefit plan contract covering dental services on or after


the effective date of this act shall file a medical loss ratio (MLR)


with the Insurance Department that is organized by market and


product type and, where appropriate, contains the same information


required in the 2013 federal Medical Loss Ratio Annual Reporting


Form (CMS-10418).


2. The MLR reporting year shall be for the calendar year during


which dental coverage is provided by the plan. All terms used in


the MLR annual report shall have the same meaning as used in the


federal Public Health Service Act, 42 U.S.C., Section 300gg-18, and


Part 158 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations.


F. 1. If data verification of the dental benefit plan’s or the


dental portion of a health benefit plan’s representations in the MLR


annual report is deemed necessary, the Department shall notify the


benefit plan thirty (30) days before the commencement of the


financial examination.

Req. No. 367 Page 4


2. The dental benefit plan or the dental portion of a health


benefit plan shall have thirty (30) days from the date of


notification to submit to the Department all requested data. The


Insurance Commissioner may extend the time period for a health


benefit plan to comply with this subsection upon a finding of good


cause.


G. The Department shall make available to the public all of the


data provided to the Department pursuant to this section.


H. The provisions of this act shall not apply to health benefit


plans under the state Medicaid program or plans offered to the


state-sponsored health benefit plans.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7012 of Title 36, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. 1. A dental benefit plan or the dental portion of a health


benefit plan that issues, sells, renews, or offers a specialized


health care service plan contract covering dental services on or


after the effective date of this act shall provide an annual rebate


to each enrollee under that coverage, on a pro rata basis, if the


ratio of the amount of premium revenue expended by the dental


benefit plan or the dental portion of a health benefit plan on the


costs for reimbursement for services provided to enrollees under


that coverage and for activities that improve dental care quality to


the total amount of premium revenue, excluding federal and state

Req. No. 367 Page 5


taxes and licensing or regulatory fees, and after accounting for


payments or receipts for risk adjustment, risk corridors, and


reinsurance, subsections C and D Section 1 of this act, is less


than, at minimum:


a. eighty percent (80%) for large group plans as defined


in 42 U.S.C., Section 18024(b)(1), and


b. seventy-five percent (75%) for individual and small


group plans as defined in 42 U.S.C., Section


18024(b)(2).


2. Dental benefit plans shall implement the provisions of


paragraph 1 of this subsection not later than January 1, 2028.


B. The total amount of an annual rebate required under this


section shall be calculated in an amount equal to the product of the


amount by which the percentage described in subsection A of this


section exceeds the insurer’s reported ratio described in


subsections C and D of Section 1 of this act multiplied by the total


amount of premium revenue, excluding federal and state taxes and


licensing or regulatory fees and after accounting for payments or


receipts for risk adjustment, risk corridors, and reinsurance.


C. A dental benefit plan or the dental portion of a health


benefit plan shall provide any rebate owed to an enrollee no later


than August 1 of the calendar year following the year for which the


ratio described in subsection A of this section was calculated.



Req. No. 367 Page 6


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7013 of Title 36, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. On or before July 1 of the preceding year, all carriers


offering dental benefit plans shall file group product base rates


and any changes to group rating factors that are to be effective on


January 1 of each year.


B. A dental benefit plan or the dental portion of a health


benefit plan that issues, sells, renews, or offers a specialized


health benefit plan contract covering dental services shall not


establish rates for any dental coverage plan issued to any


policyholder that are excessive, inadequate, or unfairly


discriminatory. To assure compliance with the requirements of this


section that rates are not excessive in relation to benefits, the


Insurance Commissioner shall promulgate rules to require rate


filings and shall require the submission of adequate documentation


and supporting information, including actuarial opinions or


certifications that the rates proposed by dental plans do not result


in the MLR exceeding the ratios described in subsection A of Section


of this act.


C. 1. If a carrier files a base rate change and the


administrative expense loading component, not including taxes and


assessments, increases by more than the most recent calendar year’s


percentage increase in the dental services Consumer Price Index for

Req. No. 367 Page 7


All Urban Consumers, U.S. city average, not seasonally adjusted, the


base rate shall be deemed excessive and presumptively disapproved.


2. If the carrier’s base rate is presumptively disapproved:


a. the carrier shall communicate to all employers and


individuals covered under a group product that the


proposed increase has been presumptively disapproved


and is subject to a hearing by the Insurance


Department, and


b. the Department shall conduct a public hearing and


shall properly advertise the hearing in compliance


with public hearing requirements.


D. The carrier shall submit expected rate increases to the


Commissioner at least sixty (60) days prior to the proposed


implementation of the rates. If the Commissioner does not approve


or disapprove the rate filings within a sixty-day period, the


carrier may implement and reasonably rely upon the rates provided.


The Commissioner may require correction of any deficiencies in the


rate filing upon later review if the rate the carrier charged is


excessive, inadequate, or unfairly discriminatory. A prospective


rate adjustment or rebate as described in Section 2 of this act is


the sole remedy for rate deficiencies. If the Commissioner finds


deficiencies in the rate filing after a sixty-day period, the


Commissioner shall provide notice to the carrier, and the carrier


shall correct the rate on a prospective basis.

Req. No. 367 Page 8


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7014 of Title 36, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Beginning July 1, 2026, and on or before July 1 of each year


thereafter, each dental insurer doing business in this state shall


file with the Insurance Department, in the form and manner


prescribed by the Department, an annual report on the dental loss


ratio for the preceding calendar year. The dental loss ratio annual


report shall include the following:


1. A combined dental loss ratio percentage for all individual


dental policies; and


2. A combined dental loss ratio percentage for all group dental


policies issued to fully insured groups.


B. Not later than August 1 of each year, the Department shall


post the reported dental loss ratios for each dental insurer on a


publicly available website in a manner that is easily located and


identifiable to the public. The Department may not post the


underlying claims, premiums, and other data used to calculate the


dental loss ratios and shall treat all claims, premiums, and other


data as confidential.


SECTION 5. AMENDATORY 36 O.S. 2021, Section 7301, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 7301. A. No contract between a dental plan of a health


benefit plan and a dentist for the provision of services to patients

Req. No. 367 Page 9


may require that a dentist provide services to its subscribers at a


fee set by the health benefit plan unless the services are covered


services under the applicable subscriber agreement.


B. As used in this section:


1. “Covered services” means services reimbursable reimbursed


under the applicable subscriber agreement, subject notwithstanding


and without regard to the contractual limitations on subscriber


benefits as may apply, including, for example, deductibles, waiting


period or frequency limitations;


2. “Dental plan” means and shall include any policy of


insurance which is issued by a health benefit plan which provides


for coverage of dental services not in connection with a medical


plan; and


3. “Health benefit plan” means any plan or arrangement as


defined in subsection C of Section 6060.4 of this title or any


dental service corporation authorized pursuant to Section 2671 of


this title.


C. A health benefit plan or dental plan shall establish and


maintain appeal procedures for any claim by a dentist or a


subscriber that is denied based on lack of medical necessity. Any


such denial shall be based upon a determination by a dentist who


holds a nonrestricted license in the United States. Any written


communication to a dentist that includes or pertains to a denial of


benefits for all or part of a claim on the basis of a lack of

Req. No. 367 Page 10


medical necessity shall include the identifier and license number


together with state of issuance, and a contact telephone number of


the licensed dentist making the adverse determination. The dentist


who reviewed the claim shall only be contacted at the telephone


number provided in the written communication about the denial during


business hours.


SECTION 6. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-367 CAD 1/16/2025 2:58:35 PM































Req. No. 367 Page 11